Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,185.02
Remedial action plan; termination; notification.

(1) The applicant may unilaterally terminate a voluntary remedial action plan approved pursuant to section 81-15,185 prior to completion of investigative and remedial activities if the applicant leaves the property in no worse condition, from a human health and environment perspective, than when the applicant initiated voluntary remedial action and the applicant reimburses the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for all outstanding costs.

(2) The department may terminate a voluntary remedial action plan if the applicant:

(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the plan or fails to fulfill any obligations of the plan, including submission of an acceptable remedial action plan within a reasonable period of time;

(b) Fails to address an immediate and significant risk of harm to public health and the environment in a timely and effective manner; or

(c) Fails to initiate the plan within six months after approval by the department or to complete the plan within twenty-four months after approval by the department, excluding long-term operation, maintenance, and monitoring, unless the department grants an extension of time.

(3) The department shall notify the applicant in writing of the intention to terminate the voluntary remedial action plan and include the reason for the termination and a summary of any unreimbursed costs of the department that are due.

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 11;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 143;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 433.